Utah statutes.
42-1-1.   By petition to district court -- Contents.

Any natural person, desiring to change his name, may file a petition therefor in the district court of the county where he resides, setting forth:

(1)  The cause for which the change of name is sought.

(2)  The name proposed.

(3)  That he has been a bona fide resident of the county for the year immediately prior to the filing of the petition.



No Change Since 1953

